Utah statutes.
38-10-108.   Limitation upon owner's liability.

Except as provided in Section 38-10-102 and Section 38-10-114, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to fix a greater liability against the owner than the price or sum agreed by the owner to be paid for his share of the work performed or the materials or equipment furnished.



Enacted by Chapter 170, 1987 General Session

